Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 2
PUBLIC ASSISTANCE

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 3 of chapter 119, C.R.S. 1963. The substantive provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1973, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1973, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Section

PART 1 COLORADO PUBLIC ASSISTANCE ACT

PART 2 COLORADO SUPPLEMENTAL SECURITY INCOME ACT

PART 3 FOOD STAMPS

PART 4 WELFARE REFORM

PART 5 PERSONAL RESPONSIBILITY AND
EMPLOYMENT DEMONSTRATION PROGRAM

PART 6 CHILD CARE TRAINING AND
EDUCATION PILOT PROGRAM

PART 7 COLORADO WORKS PROGRAM

PART 8 COLORADO CHILD CARE
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

PART 9 COLORADO SELF-SUFFICIENCY
AND EMPLOYMENT ACT

PART 10 INCENTIVES FOR SELF-SUFFICIENCY

PART 11 TRANSITIONAL JOBS PROGRAM